Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF98.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1146XS (1) 91 sb/js S.F. 98 Section 1. Section 481A.54, Code 2025, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 2A. A person shall not discharge a firearm 3 from within or on a motor vehicle, as defined in section 321.1, 4 subsection 42, on a public roadway, as defined in section 5 321.1, subsection 65. 6